Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-601
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-601 to 9-653 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 172;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 47;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 54;

Laws 1991, LB 795, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB490, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB259, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 4.